Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,197
Payment of apportioned fees; effect.

The payment to the base jurisdiction for all member and cooperating jurisdictions of apportioned fees due under the International Registration Plan Act discharges the responsibility of the registrant for payment of such apportioned fees to individual member and cooperating jurisdictions, except that the base jurisdiction shall cooperate with other declared jurisdictions in connection with applications and fees paid.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 197.